Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the State Department
of Health in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the
60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of One Hundred Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($150,000.00) shall be used to maintain sickle cell
outreach.
SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the State Department
of Health in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the
60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars
($200,000.00) shall be used for the operations of the Oklahoma State
Athletic Commission, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
State Athletic Commission Act.

SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the State Department
of Health in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the
60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Three Million Dollars
($3,000,000.00) shall be disbursed to health centers authorized
under Section 330 of the Public Health Service Act, and incorporated
in the State of Oklahoma. Any disbursement shall be for the purpose
of increasing access to primary health care which may include
medical, dental, and/or mental health and substance abuse treatment
services in or near designated Medically Underserved Areas or
Medically Underserved Populations. Any disbursement for increased
access to primary health care services shall be supported by data
according to proportions of patient volume and access for the
uninsured. The method of disbursement shall be developed by the
State Department of Health. The State Commissioner of Health is
authorized to promulgate the method of disbursement into rules.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1141 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1141 Page 3